Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1229
License required; application; qualifications.

Any person desiring to engage in the construction of water wells, the installation of pumps and pumping equipment, or the decommissioning of water wells shall make initial application for a license to the department in accordance with section 38-130. A license to engage in the construction or decommissioning of water wells or the installation of pumps and pumping equipment shall be issued to every applicant who demonstrates professional competence by successfully passing the examination prescribed in section 46-1223 and otherwise complies with the Uniform Credentialing Act, the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act, and all standards, rules, and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to such acts. Applicants shall receive licenses for any category or combination of categories for which they have successfully passed the required examination.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 122;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 19;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1164.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.